Utah statutes.
31A-35-703.   Disciplinary action.

(1) A person found to be in violation of the statutes or rules governing the conduct of bail bond producers and bail bond sureties under this chapter is subject to:

(a)  disciplinary action by the commissioner against that person's:

(i)  license, if the person is a bail bond surety company or bail bond producer; or

(ii)  certificate, if the person is a surety insurer; and

(b)  imposition of civil penalties, as authorized under Title 31A, Chapter 2, Administration of the Insurance Laws.

(2)  Penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the restricted account created in Section 31A-35-407.



Amended by Chapter 298, 2003 General Session

